pt-PT: Estilo da ponta auricular: Ponto; Flange dupla; Cilindro de espuma; Forma de corneta; Oval; Flange simples; Flange tripla; Furo largo; Com abas; Outro
en: Ear tip style: Bullet; Double flange; Foam cylinder; Horn-shaped; Oval; Single flange; Triple flange; Wide-bore; Winged; Other
zh-CN: 耳塞样式: 子弹; 双层伞型; 泡沫圆柱型; 喇叭型; 椭圆形; 单层伞型; 三层伞型; 大孔径; 有翼; 其他
sv: Öronproppsstil: Kula; Dubbelfläns; Skumcylinder; Hornformad; Oval; Enkelfläns; Trippelfläns; Bred öppning; Med vingar; Övrigt
de: Ohrpassstück‑Bauform: Kugel; Doppelflansch; Schaumstoffzylinder; Hornförmig; Oval; Einzelflansch; Dreifachflansch; Weitbohrung; Mit Flügeln; Sonstiges
fi: Korvatyynyn tyyli: Luoti; Kaksoislaippa; Vaahtomuovisylinteri; Torvimainen; Soikea; Yksittäislaippa; Kolmoislaippa; Leveäaukkoinen; Siivellinen; Muu
zh-TW: 耳塞樣式: 子彈; 雙層傘狀; 圓柱海綿; 號角形; 橢圓形; 單層傘狀; 三層傘狀; 大孔徑; 有護翼; 其他
ro-RO: Tip dop auricular: De tip glonț; Flanșă dublă; Cilindru de spumă; În formă de corn; Oval; Flanșă simplă; Flanșă triplă; Orificiu larg; Cu aripioare; Altele
it: Stile del gommino auricolare: Proiettile; Doppia flangia; Cilindro in schiuma; Forma a tromba; Ovale; Flangia singola; Tripla flangia; Foro largo; Con ali; Altro
hr-HR: Stil nastavka za uho: U obliku metka; Dvostruka prirubnica; Pjenasti cilindar; U obliku roga; Ovalna; Jednostruka prirubnica; Trostruka prirubnica; Širokog otvora; S krilcima; Ostalo
es: Estilo de almohadilla auricular: Viñeta; Doble pestaña; Cilindro de espuma; Forma de cuerno; Ovalado; Pestaña simple; Triple pestaña; Orificio ancho; Con alas; Otros
fr: Style de l’embout auriculaire: Balle; Double collerette; Cylindre en mousse; En forme de corne; Oval; Simple collerette; Triple collerette; Large ouverture; Avec ailettes; Autre
tr: Kulaklık ucu stili: Kurşun; Çift flanşlı; Köpük silindir; Korna şekilli; Oval; Tek flanşlı; Üçlü flanşlı; Geniş delikli; Kanatlı; Diğer
nl: Oordopje stijl: Bullet; Dubbele flens; Schuimcilinder; Hoorntjesvormig; Ovaal; Enkele flens; Drievoudige flens; Wijde boring; Met vleugels; Andere
pt-BR: Estilo da ponta auricular: Marcador; Flange dupla; Cilindro de espuma; Formato de cone; Oval; Flange simples; Flange tripla; Abertura larga; Com abas; Outro
vi: Kiểu đầu tai nghe: Đạn; Hai tầng; Trụ xốp; Hình loa; Hình trái xoan; Một tầng; Ba tầng; Lỗ rộng; Có cánh; Khác
nb: Ørepropp stil: Kule; Dobbel flens; Skumsylinder; Hornformet; Oval; Enkel flens; Trippel flens; Bred boring; Med vinger; Annet
cs: Styl ušního nástavce: Kulová; Dvojitá příruba; Pěnový válec; Ve tvaru rohu; Oválná; Jednoduchá příruba; Trojitá příruba; Široký otvor; S křidélky; Jiné
lt-LT: Ausies antgalio stilius: Kulkos formos; Dvigubas flanšas; Putplasčio cilindras; Rago formos; Ovalas; Viengubas flanšas; Trigubas flanšas; Plačios angos; Su sparneliais; Kita
sk-SK: Štýl ušných koncoviek: Malá valcovitá; Dvojitá príruba; Penový valec; V tvare rohu; Oválny; Jednoduchá príruba; Trojitá príruba; Široký prierez; S krídlami; Iné
th: สไตล์จุกหู: กระสุน; สองชั้น; ฟองน้ำทรงกระบอก; ทรงแตร; รูปไข่; ชั้นเดียว; สามชั้น; รูกว้าง; มีปีก; อื่นๆ
ja: イヤーチップスタイル: 弾丸; ダブルフランジ; フォームシリンダー; ホーン型; 楕円形; シングルフランジ; トリプルフランジ; ワイドボア; 羽根つき; その他
el: Στυλ άκρου ακουστικού: Με σχήμα μυτερού κώνου; Διπλή φλάντζα; Κυλινδρικό αφρώδες; Σε σχήμα κόρνας; Οβάλ; Μονή φλάντζα; Τριπλή φλάντζα; Ευρείας οπής; Με φτερά; Άλλο
ko: 이어 팁 스타일: 불릿; 더블 플랜지; 폼 실린더; 호른형; 타원형; 싱글 플랜지; 트리플 플랜지; 와이드 보어; 날개 있음; 기타
sl-SI: Slog ušesnih nastavkov: Cilindrična; Dvojna prirobnica; Penasti valj; V obliki roga; Ovalna; Enojna prirobnica; Trojna prirobnica; Široka odprtina; S krilci; Drugo
hu: Fülilleszték stílusa: Golyó; Dupla peremű; Habszivacs henger; Kürt alakú; Ovális; Egyszerű peremű; Tripla peremű; Széles nyílású; Szárnyas; Egyéb
pl: Styl końcówki dousznej: jednorazowo; Podwójny kołnierz; Cylinder piankowy; W kształcie rogu; Owalny; Pojedynczy kołnierz; Potrójny kołnierz; Szeroki otwór; Ze skrzydełkami; Inne
ru: Стиль амбушюров: Конус; Двойной фланец; Пенный цилиндр; Рупорообразные; Овал; Одинарный фланец; Тройной фланец; С широким отверстием; С крылышками; Другой
da: Øreproptype: Kugle; Dobbelt flange; Skumcylinder; Hornformet; Oval; Enkelt flange; Tredobbelt flange; Bred boring; Med vinger; Andet
bg-BG: Стил на накрайника за уши: Куршум; Двоен фланец; Пенест цилиндър; Рогоподобен; Овална; Единичен фланец; Троен фланец; С широк отвор; С крилца; Други